en: Light Leaded Glass
xx: 75 GL, GL 75, 75GL, GL75, 75 GLS, GLS 75, 75GLS, GLS75
de: Leichtes Bleiglas
es: Vidrio con un poco de plomo
fr: Verre plombé léger
it: Vetro al piombo leggero
nl: Licht loodglas

en: 76 GL - Leaded Glass, Leaded Glass
xx: 76 GL, GL 76, 76GL, GL76, 76 GLS, GLS 76, 76GLS, GLS76
ca: 76 GL - vidre de plom, vidre de plom
cs: 76 GL - Křišťálové sklo, Křišťálové sklo
da: 76 GL - blyglas, blyglas
de: 76 GL - Bleiglas, Bleiglas
es: 76 GL - vidrio de plomo, vidrio con plomo
et: 76 GL - Pliiklaas, Pliiklaas
fi: 76 GL - Kristalli, Kristalli
fr: 76 GL - cristal, cristal
hu: 76 GL - Ólomüveg, Ólomüveg, kristályüveg
it: 76 GL - vetro cristallo, vetro cristallo
lt: 76 GL - Krištolas, Krištolas
mk: 76 GL - кристал, кристал
nb: 76 GL - Krystallglass, Krystallglass
nl: 76 GL - kristal, kristal, Loodglas
nn: 76 GL - Krystallglas, Krystallglas
pl: 76 GL - szkło ołowiowe, szkło ołowiowe
pt: 76 GL - Vidro de crits, Vidro de chumbo, Cristal de chumbo
ro: 76 GL - Cristal, Cristal
ru: 76 GL - хрусталь, хрусталь
sv: 76 GL - kristallglas, kristallglas
uk: 76 GL - Кришталь, Кришталь

en: Copper Mixed/Copper Backed Glass, Copper Mixed Glass, Copper Backed Glass
xx: 77 GL, GL 77, 77GL, GL77, 77 GLS, GLS 77, 77GLS, GLS77
de: Kupfer gemischt/Glas mit Kupfer hinterlegt, Kupfer gemischt Glas, Glas mit Kupfer hinterlegt

en: Silver Mixed/Silver Backed Glass, Silver Mixed Glass, Silver Backed Glass
xx: 78 GL, GL 78, 78GL, GL78, 78 GLS, GLS 78, 78GLS, GLS78
de: Silber gemischt/Glas mit Silber hinterlegt, Silber gemischt Glas, Glas mit Silber hinterlegt

en: Gold Mixed/Gold Backed Glass, Gold Mixed Glass, Gold Backed Glass
xx: 79 GL, GL 79, 79GL, GL79, 79 GLS, GLS 79, 79GLS, GLS79
de: Gold gemischt/Glas mit Gold hinterlegt, Gold gemischt Glas, Glas mit Gold hinterlegt

en: Paper and fibreboard/miscellaneous metals, Paper and fibreboard + miscellaneous metals
xx: 80 C/X, 80 C/*, 80 CX, 80 C*
de: Papier und Pappe/verschiedene Metalle, Papier und Pappe + verschiedene Metalle
hr: papir i karton/raznovrsni metali

en: Paper and plastic, Paper + Plastic
xx: 81 C/X, 81 C/*, 81 CX, 81 C*, 81 PapPet
bg: Хартия и картон / пластмаси
de: Papier und Pappe/Kunststoff, Papier und Pappe + Kunststoff
fr: Papier et plastique
hr: papir i karton/plastika
hu: Papír és műanyag
it: Carta e plastica, Carta con plastica
nl: Papier en plastic
pt: Papel e plástico, Papel + plástico

en: Paper and fibreboard/aluminium, Paper and fibreboard + aluminium
xx: 82 C/X, 82 C/*, 82 CX, 82 C*
de: Papier und Pappe/Aluminium, Papier und Pappe + Aluminium
hr: papir i karton/aluminij

en: Paper and fibreboard/tinplate, Paper and fibreboard + tinplate
xx: 83 C/X, 83 C/*, 83 CX, 83 C*
de: Papier und Pappe/Weißblech, Papier und Pappe + Weißblech, Papier und Pappe/Weissblech, Papier und Pappe + Weissblech
hr: papir i karton/bijeli lim

en: Paper and cardboard / Plastic / Aluminium, Paper and fibreboard/plastic/aluminium, Paper and fibreboard + plastic + aluminium
xx: 84 C/X, 84 C/*, 84 CX, 84 C*, PapAl
bg: Хартия и картон / Пластмаси / Алуминий
de: Papier und Pappe/Kunststoff/Aluminium, Papier und Pappe + Kunststoff + Aluminium
hr: papir i karton/plastika/aluminij
hu: Papír és karton / Műanyag / Alumínium

en: Paper and fibreboard/plastic/aluminium/tinplate, Paper and fibreboard + plastic + aluminium + tinplate
xx: 85 C/X, 85 C/*, 85 CX, 85 C*
de: Papier und Pappe/Kunststoff/Aluminium/Weißblech, Papier und Pappe + Kunststoff + Aluminium + Weißblech, Papier und Pappe/Kunststoff/Aluminium/Weissblech, Papier und Pappe + Kunststoff + Aluminium + Weissblech
hr: papir i karton/plastika/aluminij/bijeli lim

en: Biodegradable plastic, Card-stock Laminate
xx: 87 CSL, CSL 87
bg: Биоразградима пластмаса
de: Biologisch abbaubarer Kunststoff, Kartonlaminat
hu: Lebomló műanyag, Laminált kartonpapír
it: Plastica biodegradabile
nl: Biologisch afbreekbaar plastic, Biologisch afbreekbaar plastiek
pt: Plástico biodegradável

en: Plastic/aluminium, Plastic + aluminium
xx: 90 C/ALU, C/ALU 90, 90 C/*, 90 CX, 90 C*, 90 C/X
de: Kunststoff/Aluminium, Kunststoff + Aluminium
hr: plastika/aluminij

en: Plastic/steelplate, Plastic + steelplate
xx: 91 C/FE, C/FE 91, 91 C/*, 91 CX, 91 C*, 91 C/X
de: Kunststoff/Weißblech, Kunststoff + Weißblech, Kunststoff/Weissblech, Kunststoff + Weissblech
hr: plastika/bijeli lim

en: Plastic/miscellaneous metals, Plastic + miscellaneous metals
xx: 92 C/X, 92 C/*, 92 CX, 92 C*
de: Kunststoff/verschiedene Metalle, Kunststoff + verschiedene Metalle
hr: plastika/raznovrsni metali

en: Glass/Plastic, Glass + Plastic
xx: 95 C/X, 95 C/*, 95 CX, 95 C*
de: Glas/Kunststoff, Glas + Kunststoff
hr: staklo/plastika

en: Glass/aluminium, Glass + aluminium
xx: 96 C/X, 96 C/*, 96 CX, 96 C*
de: Glas/Aluminium, Glas + Aluminium
hr: staklo/aluminij

en: Glass/tinplate, Glass + tinplate
xx: 97 C/X, 97 C/*, 97 CX, 97 C*
de: Glas/Weißblech, Glas + Weißblech, Glas/Weissblech, Glas + Weissblech
hr: staklo/bijeli lim

en: Glass/miscellaneous metals, Glass + miscellaneous metals
xx: 98 C/X, 98 C/*, 98 CX, 98 C*
de: Glas/verschiedene Metalle, Glas + verschiedene Metalle
hr: staklo/raznovrsni metali

en: SIG
xx: SIG